New Jersey, session 222, A5145.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is established the Municipal Community Center Grant Program in the Division of Housing and Community Resources in the Department of Community Affairs, which shall provide grants to municipalities, as annually appropriated, for the construction of new community centers. b.    The director shall administer the program, and shall: (1)  prescribe procedures for grant applications; (2)  advise and assist municipalities in the preparation of grant applications; (3)  establish criteria and procedures for the award of grants consistent with the provisions of this section; and (4)  monitor and evaluate the use of grant funds received by municipalities pursuant to this section. c.     Any municipality may apply to the director to receive a grant under the program to construct a new community center within the municipality.  The director shall first evaluate all applications to determine which municipalities establish the greatest need for a community center due to a current lack of such facilities, or insufficient number of such facilities relative to the population of the municipality, and shall prioritize the award of grants to these applicant municipalities.  The funds distributed under the program shall be utilized solely toward the construction of new community centers. d.    The Department of Community Affairs shall request annually as part of its annual budget proposal a minimum of $10,000,000 to fund the grants authorized pursuant to this section.  The department and the Division of Housing and Community Resources also shall pursue and utilize any available federal, State, local, and private funding for the grants authorized pursuant to this section. e.     Of the amount appropriated to the program, two percent shall be allocated to the Division of Housing and Community Resources to be used to administer the program. f.     As used in this section: Community center means any indoor or outdoor buildings, spaces, structures, or improvements intended for active or passive recreation, including but not limited to recreation fields and facilities, meeting halls, and classrooms, accommodating either organized or informal activity. Director means the director of the Division of Housing and Community Resources in the Department of Community Affairs. Program means the Municipal Community Center Grant Program established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.